New Jersey, session 221, S1764.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. The Department of Children and Families, in collaboration with the Department of Human Services and the Department of Education, shall publish information on early childhood mental health on its Internet website and disseminate the information to social workers, teachers, and child care workers, whose work consists primarily of providing services to children who are five years of age or younger. b.    The information established pursuant to this section shall include, but not be limited to: (1) discussing the importance for early childhood mental health awareness; (2) appropriately relaying mental health concerns to a parent or guardian; and (3) referring a parent or guardian to State or community resources to assess a childs mental health needs; c.     The Department of Children and Families may provide in-service training of social workers, teachers, and child care workers on the information published and disseminated pursuant to this section. 2.    The Department of Children and Families, in accordance with Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this act. 3.  This act shall take effect no later than 360 days after the date of enactment.